North Carolina, session 2025, SB878.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in recurring
funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Pinetops
to support the staffing needs of the Town's police department.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Pinetops for
equipment needs of the Town's police department.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S878-v-1*